Louisiana, session 2026, SB78.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.38(C)(2), (3), and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 33:2740.38(C)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.38. Shreveport; downtown development district
* * *
C.(1) * * *
* * *
(2) One member of the authority shall have a background in urban
planning, land use planning, commercial real estate development, commercial
real estate construction, commercial district management, architecture or
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-367 REENGROSSED
SB NO. 78
engineering.
(3) All members of the authority, other than elected officials and the
member appointed pursuant to Subsection (C)(2) of this Paragraph, shall reside
in the district or have their his personal principal place of business or office in the
district or own property in the district.
(3)(4) The terms of the members shall be three years and they each member
may be reappointed.
(4)(5) A vacancy occurring for any cause shall be filled by using the above
order and procedure until the board membership is composed as described above.
Thereafter, vacancies will be filled by this procedure, with nominations originating
from the same group that appointed the outgoing member.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall have prospective application only.